src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Ume Sami language nouns inflect in number and cases.

LEXICON 2syll
 +Sg+Nom:   #     ;
 +Sg+Acc:^WG  #     ;
 +Sg+Gen:^WG  #     ;
 +Sg+Loc:asne  #     ;
 +Pl+Nom:t   #     ;
 +Pl+Acc:i #     ;
 +Pl+Loc:isne #     ;
         #:0   Nouns ; ! Normally going via a R lexicon adding compound tags.

LEXICON 3syll
+Sg+Nom: # ;
! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
