src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in the Ume Sami language refer to objects or sets of objects, qualities, states or ideas.

LEXICON Nouns
báhkuo+N:báhkuo    2syll   ;
girjjie+N:girjjie  2syll   ;
báhkuogirjjie+N:báhkuogirjjie 2syll ;
áhttjie+N:áhttjie 2syll ;

hüvsege+N:hüvseg 3syll ;
gårttiele+N:gårttiele 3syll ;
! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
